Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.105

Adjustment of wages, etc., of employees permissible budget notwithstanding.

Notwithstanding the appropriations for any salary, or salary range of any employee or employees adopted in a final budget, the legislative body of any code city may, by ordinance, change the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of any or all of its appointive employees if sufficient funds are available for appropriation to such purposes.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.105.]